Illinois, session 104th, HB2311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Antitrust Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 60-1)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Illinois Antitrust Act.9(Source: Laws 1965, p. 1943.)